Maine, session 132, LD587.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6304-A is enacted to read:
§6304-A. Policy for access to automated external defibrillators
Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, a school administrative unit shall develop and
implement a policy that provides access to automated external defibrillators at all school-
sponsored athletic events in which students are participating on school property, including
team practices. The policy must include how a person can access an automated external
defibrillator while attending a school-sponsored athletic event. An automated external
defibrillator acquired by a school administrative unit pursuant to this section must be tested
and maintained according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines. Appropriate first
aid, ambulance, rescue service or other appropriate local emergency medical service
providers must be notified of the location and type of automated external defibrillator
acquired.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6304-B is enacted to read:
§6304-B. Athletic emergency action plans; automated external defibrillator
A school administrative unit shall develop and implement an athletic emergency action
plan based on recommendations from a nationally recognized heart health organization or
nationally recognized athletic training organization that addresses the appropriate, venue-
specific use of an automated external defibrillator by school personnel to respond to an
individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency while
attending or participating in a school-sponsored athletic event on school property, including
a team practice.
Page 1 - 132LR0810(05)